Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.060

Waiver of notice.

(1) A shareholder may waive any notice required by this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice, or in the case of notice required by RCW 23B.07.040(3), before or after the corporate action to be approved by written consent becomes effective. Except as provided by subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the waiver must be in writing, be executed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for filing by the corporation with the minutes or corporate records.

(2) A shareholder's attendance at a meeting waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting.

(3) A shareholder waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at a meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

[ 2020 c 57 s 51; 2009 c 189 s 15; 2002 c 297 s 24; 1991 c 72 s 34; 1989 c 165 s 65.]